Utah statutes.
7-8-13.   Real estate acquisition, holding, and conveyance.

An industrial bank may purchase, hold, and convey real estate, other than premises used in the conduct of its business, only for the purposes and in a manner prescribed by rule.



Amended by Chapter 92, 2004 General Session

